District of Columbia statutes.
21-2024

Appeals.

Appellate review, including the right to appellate review, interlocutory appeal, provisions as to time, manner, notice, appeal bond, stays, scope of review, record on appeal, briefs, arguments, and power of the appellate court, is governed by the rules applicable to the appeals to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2024.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1-307 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).